Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.240

Petition for adoption—Hearing—Notice—Disposition.

(1) After the reports required by RCW 26.33.190 and 26.33.200 have been filed, the court shall schedule a hearing on the petition for adoption upon request of the petitioner for adoption. Notice of the date, time, and place of hearing shall be given to the petitioner and any person or agency whose consent to adoption is required under RCW 26.33.160, unless the person or agency has waived in writing the right to receive notice of the hearing. If the child is an Indian child, notice shall also be given to the child's tribe. Notice shall be given in the manner prescribed by RCW 26.33.310.

(2) Notice of the adoption hearing shall also be given to any person who or agency which has prepared a preplacement report. The notice shall be given in the manner prescribed by RCW 26.33.230.

(3) If the court determines, after review of the petition, preplacement and post-placement reports, and other evidence introduced at the hearing, that all necessary consents to adoption are valid or have been dispensed with pursuant to RCW 26.33.170 and that the adoption is in the best interest of the adoptee, and, in the case of an adoption of an Indian child, that the adoptive parents are within the placement preferences of RCW 13.38.180 or good cause to the contrary has been shown on the record, the court shall enter a decree of adoption pursuant to RCW 26.33.250.

(4) If the court determines the petition should not be granted because the adoption is not in the best interest of the child, the court shall make appropriate provision for the care and custody of the child.

[ 2011 c 309 s 33; 1987 c 170 s 8; 1984 c 155 s 23.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 170: See note following RCW 13.04.030.